Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-223
City council; superintendents of departments; power to transfer.

In all such cities, the council may change the superintendency of any of the departments, except that of public affairs, from one of the council members to another, whenever it appears that the public service and management of the business affairs of the city would be benefited by such change.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 21, p. 431;

C.S.1922, § 3547;

C.S.1929, § 14-222;

R.S.1943, § 14-223;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 12.